Virginia statutes. Title 55.1. Property and Conveyances.
Article 4. Protection of Cooperative Purchasers.

§ 55.1-2153.
Applicability; waiver.

This article applies to all cooperative interests subject to this chapter, except as provided in subsection B or as modified or waived by agreement of purchasers of cooperative interests in a cooperative in which all units are restricted to nonresidential use.

Neither a public offering statement nor a resale certificate need be prepared or delivered in the case of:

A gratuitous disposition of a cooperative interest;

A disposition pursuant to court order;

A disposition by a government or governmental agency;

A disposition by foreclosure or transfer in lieu of foreclosure;

A disposition to a person in the business of selling cooperative interests who intends to offer those cooperative interests to purchasers; or

A disposition that may be canceled at any time and for any reason by the purchaser without penalty.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-476; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2154.
Liability for public offering statement; requirements.

Except as provided in subsection B, a declarant, prior to the offering of any cooperative interest to the public, shall prepare a public offering statement conforming to the requirements of §§

55.1-2155

,

55.1-2156

,

55.1-2157

, and

55.1-2158

.

A declarant may transfer responsibility for preparation of all or a part of the public offering statement to a successor declarant or to a person in the business of selling cooperative interests who intends to offer cooperative interests in the cooperative for his own account. In the event of any such transfer, the transferor shall provide the transferee with any information necessary to enable the transferee to fulfill the requirements of subsection A.

Any declarant or other person in the business of selling cooperative interests who offers a cooperative interest for his own account to a purchaser shall deliver a public offering statement in the manner prescribed in subsection A of §

55.1-2160

. The person who prepared all or a part of the public offering statement is liable under §§

55.1-2160

,

55.1-2169

,

55.1-2178

, and

55.1-2179

for any false or misleading statement set forth in such public offering statement or for any omission of material fact from such public offering statement with respect to that portion of the public offering statement that he prepared. If a declarant did not prepare any part of a public offering statement that he delivers, he is not liable for any false or misleading statement set forth in such public offering statement or for any omission of material fact from such public offering statement unless he had actual knowledge of the statement or omission or, in the exercise of reasonable care, should have known of the statement or omission.

If a unit is part of a cooperative and is part of any other real estate regime in connection with the sale of which the delivery of a public offering statement is required under the laws of the Commonwealth, a single public offering statement, conforming to the requirements of §§

55.1-2155

,

55.1-2156

,

55.1-2157

, and

55.1-2158

as those requirements relate to each regime in which the unit is located and to any other requirements imposed under the laws of the Commonwealth, may be prepared and delivered in lieu of providing two or more public offering statements.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-477; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2155.
Public offering statement; general provisions.

Except as provided in subsection B, a public offering statement shall contain or fully and accurately disclose:

The name and principal address of the declarant and of the cooperative;

A general description of the cooperative, including to the extent possible the types, number, declarant’s schedule of commencement, and completion of construction of buildings and amenities that the declarant anticipates including in the cooperative;

The number of units in the cooperative;

Copies and a brief narrative description of the significant features of the declaration and any other recorded covenants, conditions, restrictions, and reservations affecting the cooperative; the bylaws and any rules or regulations of the association; copies of any contracts and leases to be signed by purchasers at closing; and a brief narrative description of any contracts or leases that will or may be subject to cancellation by the association under §

55.1-2136

;

Any current balance sheet and a projected budget for the association, either within or as an exhibit to the public offering statement, for one year after the date of the first conveyance to a purchaser, and thereafter the current budget of the association, a statement of who prepared the budget, and a statement of the budget’s assumptions concerning occupancy and inflation factors. The budget shall include:

A description of provisions made in the budget for reserves for repairs and replacement;

A statement of any other reserves;

The projected common expense assessment by category of expenditures for the association;

The projected monthly common expense assessment for each type of unit; and

The projected debt, inclusive of principal and any accrued interest, loan fees, and other similar charges, assumed or to be assumed by the association and an estimate of the payments necessary to service such debt.

If a cooperative composed of not more than three units is not subject to any development rights, and no power is reserved to a declarant to make the cooperative part of a larger cooperative, a group of cooperatives, or other real estate, a public offering statement may include the information otherwise required by subdivisions A 9 and 10 and 15 through 19 and the narrative descriptions of documents required by subdivision A 4.

A declarant promptly shall amend the public offering statement to report any material change in the information required by this section.

The declarant shall provide a copy of the public offering statement and all amendments to the association, and the association shall maintain them in its records.

6.

Any services not reflected in the budget that the declarant provides, or expenses that he pays and that he expects may become at any subsequent time a common expense of the association, and the projected common expense assessment attributable to each of those services or expenses for the association and for each type of unit;

7.

Any initial or special fee due from the purchaser at closing, together with a description of the purpose and method of calculating the fee;

8.

A description of any liens, defects, or encumbrances on or affecting the title to the cooperative;

9.

A description of any financing offered or arranged by the declarant;

10.

The terms and significant limitations of any warranties provided by the declarant, including statutory warranties and limitations on the enforcement of such warranties or on damages;

11.

A statement that:

a.

Within 10 days after receipt of a public offering statement a purchaser, before conveyance, may cancel any contract for purchase of a cooperative interest from a declarant; and

b.

If a declarant fails to provide a public offering statement to a purchaser before conveying a cooperative interest, that purchaser may recover from the declarant 10 percent of the sales price of the cooperative interest, plus 10 percent of the share, proportionate to his common expense liability, of the indebtedness of the association secured by mortgages or deeds of trust encumbering the cooperative;

12.

A statement of any unsatisfied judgments or pending actions against the association and the status of any pending actions material to the cooperative of which a declarant has actual knowledge;

13.

A statement that any deposit made in connection with the purchase of a cooperative interest will be held in an escrow account until closing and will be returned to the purchaser if the purchaser cancels the contract pursuant to §

55.1-2160

, together with the name and address of the escrow agent;

14.

Any restrictions on (i) use and occupancy of the units; (ii) alienation of the cooperative interests; (iii) the amount for which a cooperative interest may be sold; or (iv) the amount that may be received by a proprietary lessee upon sale, condemnation, or casualty loss to the unit or the cooperative or termination of the cooperative;

15.

A description of the insurance coverage provided for the benefit of proprietary lessees;

16.

Any current or expected fees or charges to be paid by proprietary lessees for the use of the common elements and other facilities related to the cooperative;

17.

The extent to which financial arrangements have been provided for completion of all improvements labeled “MUST BE BUILT” pursuant to §

55.1-2171

;

18.

A brief narrative description of any zoning and other land use requirements affecting the cooperative;

19.

A specified or maximum amount, if any, of acquisition, development, or construction debt, inclusive of principal and any accrued interest, loan fees, and other similar charges, assumed or to be assumed by the association and whether there will be a security interest encumbering the cooperative to secure repayment;

20.

All unusual and material circumstances, features, and characteristics of the cooperative and the units;

21.

Whether the proprietary lessees will be entitled, for federal, state, and local income tax purposes, to a pass-through of deductions for payments made by the association for real estate taxes and interest paid the holder of a security interest encumbering the cooperative; and

22.

A statement as to the effect on every proprietary lessee if the association fails to pay real estate taxes or payments due the holder of a security interest encumbering the cooperative.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-478; 2004, c. 242; 2005, c. 436; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2156.
Public offering statement; cooperatives subject to development rights.

If the declaration provides that a cooperative is subject to any development rights, the public offering statement shall disclose, in addition to the information required by §

55.1-2155

:

The maximum number of units and the maximum number of units per acre that may be created;

A statement of how many or what percentage of the units that may be created will be restricted exclusively to residential use, or a statement that no representations are made regarding use restrictions;

If any of the units that may be built within real estate subject to development rights are not to be restricted exclusively to residential use, a statement, with respect to each portion of that real estate, of the maximum percentage of the real estate areas and the maximum percentage of the floor areas of all units that may be created therein that are not restricted exclusively to residential use;

A brief narrative description of any development rights reserved by a declarant and of any conditions relating to or limitations upon the exercise of development rights;

A statement of the maximum extent to which each cooperative interest’s allocated interests may be changed by the exercise of any development right described in subdivision 4;

A statement of the extent to which any buildings may be erected or other improvements that may be made pursuant to any development right in any part of the cooperative will be compatible with existing buildings and improvements in the cooperative in terms of architectural style, quality of construction, and size, or a statement that no assurances are made in those regards;

General descriptions of all other improvements that may be made, and limited common elements that may be created within any part of the cooperative pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

A statement of any limitations as to the locations of any building or other improvement that may be made within any part of the cooperative pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

A statement that any limited common elements created pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant will be of the same general types and sizes as the limited common elements within other parts of the cooperative, a statement of the types and sizes planned, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

A statement that the proportion of limited common elements to units created pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant will be approximately equal to the proportion existing within other parts of the cooperative, a statement of any other assurances in that regard, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

A statement that all restrictions in the declaration affecting use and occupancy of units and alienation of cooperative interests will apply to any units and cooperative interests created pursuant to any development right reserved by the declarant, a statement of any differentiations that may be made as to those units and cooperative interests, or a statement that no assurances are made in that regard;

A specified or maximum amount, if any, of acquisition, development, or construction debt, inclusive of principal and any accrued interest, loan fees, and other similar charges, assumed or to be assumed by the association for each phase of the development and whether there will be a security interest encumbering the cooperative to secure repayment. If no such amount can be specified, a statement that no amount may be assumed unless approved by persons entitled to cast at least 80 percent of the votes in the association, including a simple majority of the votes allocated to cooperative interests not owned by a declarant, or any larger percentage the declaration specifies; and

A statement of the extent to which any assurances made pursuant to this section apply or do not apply in the event that any development right is not exercised by the declarant.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-479; 2004, c. 242; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2157.
Public offering statement; time-shares.

If the declaration provides that ownership of cooperative interests or occupancy of any units is or may be in time-shares, the public offering statement shall disclose, in addition to the information required by §

55.1-2155

:

The number and identity of units in which time-shares may be created;

The total number of time-shares that may be created;

The minimum duration of any time-shares that may be created; and

The extent to which the creation of time-shares will or may affect the enforceability of the association’s lien for assessments provided in §

55.1-2149

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-480; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2158.
Public offering statement; cooperatives containing conversion building.

In addition to the information required by §

55.1-2155

, the public offering statement of a cooperative containing any conversion building shall contain:

A statement by the declarant, based on a report prepared by an independent, registered architect or engineer, describing the present condition of all structural components and mechanical and electrical installations material to the use and enjoyment of the building;

A statement by the declarant of the expected useful life of each item reported on in subdivision 1, or a statement that no representations are made in that regard; and

A list of any outstanding notices of uncured violations of building code or other municipal regulations, together with the estimated cost of curing those violations.

This section applies only to buildings containing units that may be occupied for residential use.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-481; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2159.
Public offering statement; cooperative securities.

If an interest in a cooperative is currently registered with the Securities and Exchange Commission of the United States, a declarant satisfies all requirements relating to the preparation of a public offering statement of this chapter if he delivers to the purchaser and files with the agency a copy of the public offering statement filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission. A cooperative interest is not a security under the provisions of the Securities Act, §§

13.1-501

through

13.1-527.3

.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-482; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2160.
Purchaser’s right to cancel.

A person required to deliver a public offering statement pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-2154

shall provide a purchaser with a copy of the public offering statement and all amendments to the public offering statement before conveyance of that cooperative interest and not later than the date of any contract of sale. The purchaser may cancel the contract within 10 days after signing the contract.

If a purchaser elects to cancel a contract pursuant to subsection A, he may do so by hand delivering notice of such cancellation to the offeror or by mailing notice of such cancellation by prepaid United States mail to the offeror or to his agent for service of process. Cancellation is without penalty, and all payments made by the purchaser before cancellation shall be refunded promptly.

If a person required to deliver a public offering statement pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-2154

fails to provide to a purchaser to whom a cooperative interest is conveyed that public offering statement and all amendments as required by subsection A, the purchaser, in addition to any rights to damages or other relief, is entitled to receive from that person an amount equal to 10 percent of the sales price of the cooperative interest, plus 10 percent of the share, proportionate to his common expense liability, of the indebtedness of the association secured by mortgages or deeds of trust encumbering the cooperative. Execution of a purchase agreement for a cooperative interest that makes reference to the public offering statement and in which the purchaser acknowledges receipt of the public offering statement shall be sufficient proof that the declarant has fully satisfied this requirement.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-483; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2161.
Resales of cooperative interests.

Except in the case of a sale where delivery of a public offering statement is required, or unless exempt under subsection B of §

55.1-2153

, a proprietary lessee shall furnish to a purchaser before execution of any contract for sale of a cooperative interest, or otherwise before conveyance, a copy of the declaration, the bylaws, the rules and regulations of the association, and a certificate containing:

A statement disclosing the effect on the proposed disposition of any right of first refusal or other restraint on the free alienability of the cooperative interest;

A statement setting forth the amount of the monthly common expense assessment and any unpaid common expense or special assessment currently due and payable from the selling proprietary lessee;

A statement of any other fees payable by proprietary lessees;

A statement of any capital expenditures anticipated by the association for the current and next two succeeding fiscal years;

The current reserve study report or a summary of such report and a statement of the status and amount of any reserve or replacement fund and of any portions of those reserves designated by the association for any specified projects;

The most recent regularly prepared balance sheet and income and expense statement, if any, of the association, including the amount of any debt owed by the association or to be assumed by the association, inclusive of principal and any accrued interest, loan fees, and other similar charges;

The current operating budget of the association;

A statement of any unsatisfied judgments against the association and the status of any pending actions in which the association is a defendant;

A statement describing any insurance coverage provided for the benefit of proprietary lessees;

A statement as to whether the executive board has knowledge that any alterations or improvements to the unit or to the limited common elements assigned to such unit violate any provision of the declaration;

A statement as to whether the executive board has knowledge of any violations of the health or building codes with respect to the unit, the limited common elements assigned to such unit, or any other portion of the cooperative;

A statement of the remaining term of any leasehold estate affecting the cooperative and the provisions governing any extension or renewal of such leasehold;

Except where no public offering statement was prepared, a statement that the public offering statement and any amendments to the public offering statement are records of the association available for inspection by the purchaser;

An accountant’s statement, if any was prepared, as to the deductibility for federal income taxes purposes by the proprietary lessee of real estate taxes and interest paid by the association;

A statement of any restrictions in the declaration affecting the amount that may be received by a proprietary lessee upon sale, condemnation, or loss to the unit or the cooperative on termination of the cooperative; and

Certification, if applicable, that the proprietary lessees’ association has filed with the Common Interest Community Board the annual report required by §

55.1-2182

; such certification shall indicate the filing number assigned by the Common Interest Community Board and the expiration date of such filing.

The association, within 10 days after a request by a proprietary lessee, shall furnish a certificate containing the information necessary to enable the proprietary lessee to comply with this section. A proprietary lessee providing a certificate pursuant to subsection A is not liable to the purchaser for any erroneous information provided by the association and included in the certificate.

A purchaser is not liable for any unpaid assessment or fee greater than the amount set forth in the certificate prepared by the association. A proprietary lessee is not liable to a purchaser for the failure or delay of the association to provide the certificate in a timely manner, but the purchase contract is voidable by the purchaser until five days after the certificate is provided or until conveyance, whichever occurs first.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-484; 1997, c. 222; 1998, c. 463; 2004, c. 242; 2005, c. 436; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2162.
Escrow of deposits.

Any deposit made in connection with the purchase or reservation of a cooperative interest from a person required to deliver a public offering statement pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-2154

shall be placed in escrow and held either in the Commonwealth or in the state in which the unit that is a part of that cooperative interest is located in an account designated solely for that purpose by a title insurance company, attorney, or real estate broker licensed under the laws of the Commonwealth, an independent bonded escrow company, or an institution whose accounts are insured by a governmental agency or instrumentality until (i) delivered to the declarant at closing, (ii) delivered to the declarant because of the purchaser’s default under a contract to purchase the cooperative interest, or (iii) refunded to the purchaser.

Any deposit made in connection with the purchase of a cooperative interest from a person not required to deliver a public offering statement shall be placed in escrow in the same manner as prescribed in subsection A. Upon receipt of the certificate called for in §

55.1-2161

, should the purchaser elect to void the contract, the seller may deduct the actual charges by the association for preparation of the certificate. Otherwise, the deposit shall be promptly returned to the purchaser.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-485; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2163.
Release of liens.

In the case of a sale of a cooperative interest where delivery of a public offering statement is required pursuant to subsection C of §

55.1-2154

, a seller shall, before conveying a cooperative interest, record or furnish to the purchaser releases of all liens affecting the unit that is a part of that cooperative interest and any limited common element assigned to such unit, except liens solely against the unit and any limited common element assigned to such unit, that the purchaser expressly agrees to take subject to or assume. Releases of liens shall be made pursuant to §§

55.1-339

through

55.1-345

. This subsection does not apply to any real estate that a declarant has the right to withdraw.

Before conveying real estate to the association, the declarant shall have that real estate released from (i) all liens the foreclosure of which would deprive proprietary lessees of any right of access to or easement of support of their units and (ii) all other liens on such real estate unless the public offering statement describes certain real estate that may be conveyed subject to liens in specified amounts.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-486; 2004, c. 242; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2164.
Conversion buildings.

For the purposes of this section:“Disabled” means suffering from a severe, chronic physical or mental impairment that results in substantial functional limitations.“Elderly” means not less than 62 years of age.

A declarant of a cooperative containing conversion buildings shall give each of the tenants of a conversion building formal notice of the conversion at the time the cooperative is registered by the Common Interest Community Board. This notice shall advise each tenant of (i) the offering price of the cooperative interests for the unit he occupies; (ii) the projected common expense assessments against that cooperative interest for at least the first year of the cooperative’s operation; (iii) any relocation services, public or private, of which the declarant is aware; (iv) any measure taken or to be taken by the declarant to reduce the incidence of tenant dislocation; and (v) the details of the relocation plan, if any is provided by the declarant, to assist tenants in relocating. No tenant or subtenant may be required to vacate upon less than 120 days’ notice, except by reason of nonpayment of rent, waste, or conduct that disturbs other tenants’ peaceful enjoyment of the premises, and the terms of the tenancy may not be altered during that period. Until the expiration of the 120-day period, the declarant shall have no right of access to the unit except as provided in this section and in subsection A of §

55.1-1229

except that, upon 45 days’ written notice to the tenant, the declarant may enter the unit in order to make additional repairs, decorations, alterations, or improvements, provided that (a) the making of the same does not constitute an actual or constructive eviction of the tenant and (b) such entry is made either with the consent of the tenant or only at times when the tenant is absent from the unit. Failure to give notice as required by this section is a defense to an action for possession. The declarant shall also provide general notice to the tenants of the cooperative or proposed cooperative at the time of application to the Common Interest Community Board, in addition to the formal notice required by this subsection.

For 60 days after delivery or mailing of the formal notice described in subsection B, the person required to give the notice shall offer to convey the cooperative interest for each unit or proposed unit occupied for residential use to the tenant who leases the unit associated with that cooperative interest. A specific statement of the purchase price and the amount of any initial or special cooperative fee due from the purchaser on or before settlement of the purchase contract and the basis of such fee shall be given to the tenant. If a tenant fails to purchase the cooperative interest during that 60-day period, the offeror shall not offer to dispose of an interest in that cooperative interest during the following 180 days at a price or on terms more favorable to the offeree than the price or terms offered to the tenant. This subsection does not apply to any cooperative interest in a conversion building if the unit that is part of that cooperative interest will be restricted exclusively to nonresidential use or the boundaries of the converted unit do not substantially conform to the dimensions of the residential unit before conversion.

If a seller, in violation of subsection C, conveys a cooperative interest to a purchaser for value who has no knowledge of the violation, that conveyance extinguishes any right a tenant may have under subsection C to purchase that cooperative interest if the deed states that the seller has complied with subsection C but does not affect the right of a tenant to recover damages from the seller for a violation of subsection C.

If a notice of conversion specifies a date by which a unit or proposed unit must be vacated, and otherwise complies with the provisions of §§

55.1-1202

and

55.1-1225

, the notice also constitutes a notice to vacate as specified by §§

55.1-1410

,

55.1-1202

, and

55.1-1225

. The details of the relocation plan, if any is provided by the declarant for assisting tenants in relocating, shall also be provided to the tenant.

Any locality may require by ordinance that the declarant of a conversion cooperative file with that governing body all information required by the Common Interest Community Board pursuant to §

55.1-2176

and a copy of the formal notice required by subsection B. Such information shall be filed with that governing body when the application for registration is filed with the Common Interest Community Board, and such copy of the formal notice shall be filed with that governing body whenever it is sent to tenants. No fee shall be imposed for such filings with a governing body.

The governing body of any county utilizing the urban county executive form of optional government (§§

15.2-800

through

15.2-858

) or the county manager plan of optional government (§§

15.2-702

through

15.2-749

), or of any city or town adjoining any such county, may require by ordinance that the declarant of any residential cooperative containing conversion buildings converted from multi-family rental use shall reimburse any tenant displaced by the conversion for amounts actually expended to relocate as a result of such dislocation. The reimbursement shall not be required to exceed the amount that the tenant would have been entitled to receive under §§

25.1-407

and

25.1-415

if the real estate comprising the condominium had been condemned by the Department of Highways and Transportation.

Any locality may require by ordinance that elderly or disabled tenants, occupying as their residence up to 20 percent of the apartments or units in a cooperative containing conversion buildings at the time of issuance of the general notice required by subsection B, be offered leases or extensions of leases on the apartments or units they occupy or on other apartments or units of at least equal size and overall quality for up to three years beyond the date of such notice.The terms and conditions of such leases or extensions of leases shall be as agreed upon by the lessor and the lessee, provided that the rent for such apartment or unit shall not be in excess of reasonable rent for comparable apartments or units in the same market area as such conversion building.Such leases or extensions shall not be required, however, in the case of any apartments or units that will, in the course of the conversion, be substantially altered in physical layout, restricted exclusively to nonresidential use, or be converted in such a manner as to require relocation of the tenant in premises outside of the project being converted.

Nothing in this section permits termination of a lease by a declarant in violation of its terms.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-487; 1983, c. 310; 1984, c. 321; 1985, c. 69; 1993, c. 634; 2008, cc. 851, 871; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2165.
Express warranties of quality.

Express warranties made by any seller to a purchaser of a cooperative interest, if relied upon by the purchaser, are created as follows:

Any affirmation of fact or promise that relates to the unit, its use, or rights appurtenant to such unit, area improvements to the cooperative that would directly benefit the unit, or the right to use or have the benefit of facilities not located in the cooperative creates an express warranty that the unit and related rights and uses will conform to the affirmation or promise;

Any model or description of the physical characteristics of the cooperative, including plans and specifications of or for improvements, creates an express warranty that the cooperative will conform to the model or description;

Any description of the quantity or extent of the real estate comprising the cooperative, including plats or surveys, creates an express warranty that the cooperative will conform to the description, subject to customary tolerances; and

A provision that a buyer of a cooperative interest may put a unit that is part of that cooperative interest only to a specified use is an express warranty that the specified use is lawful.

Neither formal words, such as “warranty” or “guarantee,” nor a specific intention to make a warranty is necessary to create an express warranty of quality, but a statement purporting to be merely an opinion or commendation of the real estate or its value does not create a warranty.

Any conveyance of a cooperative interest transfers to the purchaser all express warranties of quality made by previous sellers.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-488; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2166.
Implied warranties of quality.

A declarant and any person in the business of selling cooperative interests for his own account warrant that a unit will be in at least as good condition at the earlier of the time of the conveyance of a cooperative interest or delivery of possession as it was at the time of contracting, reasonable wear and tear excepted.

A declarant and any person in the business of selling cooperative interests for his own account impliedly warrant that a unit and the common elements in the cooperative are suitable for the ordinary uses of real estate of its type and that any improvements made or contracted for by him or made by any person before the creation of the cooperative will be:

Free from defective materials; and

Constructed in accordance with applicable law, according to sound engineering and construction standards, and in a workmanlike manner.

In addition, a declarant and any person in the business of selling cooperative interests for his own account warrant to a purchaser of a cooperative interest for a unit that may be used for residential use that an existing use, continuation of which is contemplated by the parties, does not violate applicable law at the earlier of the time of conveyance or delivery of possession.

Warranties imposed by this section may be excluded or modified as specified in §

55.1-2167

.

For purposes of this section, improvements made or contracted for by an affiliate of a declarant are made or contracted for by the declarant.

Any conveyance of a cooperative interest transfers to the purchaser all of the declarant’s implied warranties of quality.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-489; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.

§ 55.1-2167.
Exclusion or modification of implied warranties of quality.

Except as limited by subsection B with respect to a purchaser of a cooperative interest for a unit that may be used for residential use, implied warranties of quality (i) may be excluded or modified by agreement of the parties and (ii) are excluded by expression of disclaimer, such as “as is,” “with all faults,” or other language that in common understanding calls the buyer’s attention to the exclusion of warranties.

With respect to a purchaser of a cooperative interest for a unit that may be occupied for residential use, no general disclaimer of implied warranties of quality is effective, nor shall any disclaimer of implied warranties of quality be effective as to defects in materials or construction as to any unit, brought to the attention of the declarant within two years from the date of the first conveyance of the cooperative interest associated with such unit, or as to any such defect in the common elements brought to the attention within two years (i) after that common element has been completed or, if later, (ii) after the first cooperative interest has been conveyed in the cooperative. The first conveyance of a cooperative interest associated with a unit situated in real estate subject to development rights shall be treated as the first conveyance of a cooperative interest in the cooperative for the purposes of the preceding sentence as to any such defects in the common elements within that real estate. A declarant, and any person in the business of selling cooperative interests for his own account, may disclaim liability in an instrument signed by the purchaser for a specified defect or specified failure to comply with applicable law, if the defect or failure entered into became a part of the basis of the bargain.

History.

1982, c. 277, § 55-490; 2019, c. 712.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2019.